cs: Typ konektoru USB: Vlastní USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typ A; USB typ B; USB typ C; Jiné
da: USB-stiktype: Navnebeskyttet USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka USB: Lastniški USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip-A; USB tip-B; USB tipa C; Drugo
it: Tipo di connettore USB: USB proprietario; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Altro
sk-SK: Typ konektora USB: Vlastnícky USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typu A; USB typu B; USB typu C; Iné
ja: USBコネクタの種類: 独自のUSB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; その他
pl: Typ złącza USB: Własne USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typu A; USB typu B; USB typu C; Inne
de: USB-Anschlusstyp: Proprietäres USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB-Typ-A; USB-Typ-B; USB-Typ-C; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de conector USB: USB proprietário; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului USB: USB propriu; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip A; USB tip B; USB tip C; Altele
tr: USB bağlantı türü: Tescilli USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Tip-A; USB Tip-B; USB Tip-C; Diğer
es: Tipo de conector USB: USB patentado; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Otros
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης USB: Ιδιοταγές USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Άλλο
vi: Loại cổng USB: Proprietary USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Khác
zh-CN: USB 连接器类型: 专用 USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB A 型; USB B 型; USB C 型; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de conector USB: USB Proprietário; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Outro
fi: USB-liitintyyppi: Valmistajakohtainen USB; USB micro-B; USB mini-B; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Muu
bg-BG: Тип USB конектор: Собствен USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Други
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อ USB: USB ที่เป็นกรรมสิทธิ์; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de connecteur USB: USB propriétaire; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB type A; USB type B; USB type C; Autre
nl: USB-connectortype: Eigendom USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Andere
hu: USB-csatlakozó típusa: Szabadalmazott USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB-A; USB-B; USB-C; Egyéb
ru: Тип разъема USB: Фирменный USB-разъем; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Другой
en: USB connector type: Proprietary USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Other
nb: USB-kontakttype: Privateid USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta USB priključka: Vlasnički USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip-A; USB tip-B; USB tip-C; Ostalo
lt-LT: USB jungties tipas: Patentuotas USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB A tipo; USB B tipo; USB C tipo; Kita
sv: USB-kontakttyp: Proprietär USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typ-A; USB typ-B; USB typ-C; Övrigt
ko: USB 커넥터 유형: 독점 USB; USB 마이크로-B; USB 미니-B; USB 타입-A; USB 타입-B; USB 타입-C; 기타
zh-TW: USB 連接器類型: 專用 USB; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; 其他